Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C‑110.5] Replacing
motor vehicle insurance policy through an insurer's affiliate or subsidiary.
An insurer shall be exempt from provisions governing policy cancellations or
nonrenewals in sections 431:10C-111, 431:10C-111.5, and 431:10C‑112 if:

(1) The insurer offers to replace the insured's
policy through the insurer's affiliate or subsidiary;

(2) The replacement policy is effective upon the
expiration of the existing policy;

(3) The replacement policy provides the same or
better coverage, terms, and conditions as the existing policy at a lower
premium than the existing policy;

(4) The insurer provides at least thirty days written
notice of the prospective replacement to the insured; provided that the insured
may waive notice pursuant to this paragraph; and

(5) The insured accepts the replacement policy. [L
2011, c 11, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next